Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
Capital Projects and Bonds

45.750.
Definitions for KRS 45.760 to 45.810 — Application of KRS 45.760 to 45.810.

As used in KRS

45.760

to

45.810

:

“Committee” means the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee;

“Capital construction item” means:

The construction, reconstruction, acquisition, and structural maintenance of buildings;

The installation of utility services, including roads and sewers;

The acquisition or improvement of real property;

The purchase and installation initially or during major renovation of equipment, facilities, and furnishings of a permanent nature for buildings; or

The acquisition of any building to be occupied by any:

Subdivision of state government as defined in KRS

12.010

or enumerated in KRS

12.020

;

Municipal corporation which exercises its authority on a statewide basis including, but not limited to, the Kentucky Employees Retirement System, Teachers’ Retirement System of the State of Kentucky, Kentucky Higher Education Student Loan Corporation, Kentucky Lottery Corporation, Kentucky Housing Corporation, or any entity with a governing body whose membership is substantially similar to the membership of the governing body of a municipal corporation which exercises its authority on a statewide basis; and

Institution of higher education;

“Lease” means any lease, lease-purchase, or lease with an option to purchase of any real property space occupied by:

Any entity listed in paragraph (b)5. of this subsection;

The legislative branch; or

The judicial branch when leased from a private sector landlord;

“Equipment” means:

Any major item of equipment, including aircraft;

Any movable furnishing, appurtenance, or other equipment, necessary to make a building operable; and

Equipment purchased or otherwise acquired, or equipment to be purchased or otherwise to be acquired, under a lease or lease-purchase contract or agreement or an arrangement equivalent to a lease or lease-purchase contract or agreement;

“Information technology system” means any related computer or telecommunications components that provide a functional system for a specific business purpose and contain one (1) or more of the following:

Hardware;

Software, including application software, systems management software, utility software, or communications software;

Professional services for requirements analysis, system integration, installation, implementation, or data conversion services; or

Digital data products, including acquisition and quality control;

“Capital projects” means, regardless of the source of cash or other consideration:

Any capital construction item, or any combination of capital construction items necessary to make a building or utility installation complete, estimated to cost one million dollars ($1,000,000) or more in cash or other consideration;

Any lease of real property space with an annual rental cost exceeding two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000);

The use allowance paid by the judicial branch for a real property space pursuant to KRS 26A.090(2) and

26A.115

when the use allowance for the space exceeds two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) on an annual basis;

Any item of equipment estimated to cost two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) or more in cash or other consideration;

Any lease of an item of movable equipment if the annual cost of the lease is two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) or more or if the total cost of the lease-purchase or lease with an option to purchase is two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) or more; and

Any new acquisition, upgrade, or replacement of an information technology system estimated to cost one million dollars ($1,000,000) or more in cash or other consideration;

“Emergency repair, maintenance, or replacement project” means the maintenance, repair, or reconstruction of a capital construction project or the maintenance, repair, or replacement of a major item of equipment that is:

Necessitated by injury or damage resulting from a disaster;

Necessary to maintain government operations or to prevent or minimize injury or damage that could reasonably be expected to result from an impending disaster; or

Necessitated by an unforeseen mechanical breakdown, electrical breakdown, or structural defect that must be corrected to make a facility or item of equipment usable;

“Disaster” means a fire, flood, tornado, other natural disaster, riot, enemy attack, sabotage, explosion, power failure, energy shortage, transportation emergency, or other man-caused disaster;

“Capital construction funds” means any funds used for capital construction, including, but not limited to, appropriated capital construction funds, agency funds, federal funds, private funds, or funds from any source held by an agency for management or investment purposes; and

“Entity head” means the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court, the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, the president of any university which complies with KRS

164A.585

,

164A.595

, and

164A.600

, the board of trustees of the Kentucky Employees Retirement System, the board of trustees of the Teachers’ Retirement System of the State of Kentucky, the board of directors of the Kentucky Higher Education Student Loan Corporation, the board of directors of the Kentucky Lottery Corporation, or the board of directors of the Kentucky Housing Corporation.

Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, KRS

45.760

to

45.810

shall apply to capital projects and bonds for use by:

The state government;

One of its departments or agencies, as defined in KRS

12.010

or enumerated in KRS

12.020

;

A municipal corporation which exercises its authority on a statewide basis, including but not limited to the Kentucky Employees Retirement System, Teachers’ Retirement System of the State of Kentucky, Kentucky Higher Education Student Loan Corporation, Kentucky Lottery Corporation, and Kentucky Housing Corporation; and

Institutions of higher education.

KRS

45.760

to

45.810

shall not apply to:

Capital projects or bonds used directly in or for the construction or maintenance of roads, including but not limited to bulldozers, graders, earth movers, and real estate purchased for rights-of-way; and

Political subdivisions, except for those defined in KRS

12.010

, enumerated in KRS

12.020

, or created as a municipal corporation which exercises its authority on a statewide basis including, but not limited to, the Kentucky Employees Retirement System, Teachers’ Retirement System of the State of Kentucky, Kentucky Higher Education Student Loan Corporation, Kentucky Lottery Corporation, Kentucky Housing Corporation, or any entity with a governing body whose membership is substantially similar to the membership of the governing body of a municipal corporation which exercises its authority on a statewide basis. However, the provisions of KRS

45.750

to

45.810

shall not apply to acquisition or maintenance of any building or land which is purchased as a legal investment by any of the state retirement systems, which is not to be occupied by the retirement system, and which is financed solely with those assets of the retirement system used for investment purposes.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1979 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 1, effective January 1, 1980; 1982, ch. 300, § 6, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 72, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 16, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1988, ch. 145, § 3, effective July 15, 1988; 1992, ch. 47, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 7, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 31, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 486, § 19, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 119, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 506, § 16, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 536, § 16, effective July 14, 2000; 2003, ch. 188, § 1, effective June 24, 2003; 2006, ch. 199, § 2, effective July 12, 2006; 2016 ch. 138, § 2, effective April 27, 2016; 2018 ch. 20, § 2, effective July 14, 2018.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/94). This section was amended by 1994 Ky. Acts chs. 7, 31, and 486. Where these Acts are not in conflict they have been codified together. Where a conflict exists between Acts chs. 7 and 31, Acts ch. 31, which was last enacted by the General Assembly, prevails under KRS

446.250

.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, J, 1, (7) at 1692.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The original enactment of this section (SB 44, Chapter 4, Section 1, 1979 Ex. Sess.) is unconstitutional under Ky. Const., § 51 because the definition of a “major item of equipment” in subsection (1)(d) of this section included movable equipment coming under the term “capital construction” and coming under “noncapital construction equipment” and, therefore, the enactment violated the prohibition against a law relating to more than one subject.

OAG 80-217

.

The renovation of a fairgrounds stadium, to prepare it for use of a professional baseball team, if accomplished by a private nonprofit corporation using private capital, need not comply with the provisions of the Capital Construction and Equipment Financing Act which regulates the expenditure of certain funds appropriated by the General Assembly.

OAG 81-341

.

Under subsection (2) of this section, the equipment used in state road planning, mapping, preparing roadway plans, acquisition of rights-of-way, etc., is equipment used in connection with the construction and maintenance of roads and the purchase of such equipment is explicitly exempt from the statutes (KRS

45.750

to

45.800

) governing capital construction and equipment financing.

OAG 82-589

.

The Capital Construction Financing Act does not apply to the financing of a building’s construction by a private corporation such as the University of Kentucky Alumni Association.

OAG 94-63

.

45.760.
Limitations on project and equipment expenditures in State Capital Construction Program.

The provisions of any other law notwithstanding:

During any biennium the amount allotted, from all sources, for expenditure on any project in the state capital construction program for that biennium shall not exceed the estimated cost of the project during that biennium, as shown in any branch budget bill enacted by the General Assembly, except as provided in this section and KRS

45.770

and

45.780

.

When the General Assembly disapproves a capital project or item of equipment that was previously approved, it shall be eliminated as a capital project or major item of equipment in the Capital Projects Program. General fund moneys appropriated for that project or item of equipment but not allotted, and general fund moneys allotted but not expended to the project or equipment account, shall be transferred to the capital construction and equipment purchase contingency account in the capital construction fund. Agency or federal funds for a disapproved project or item, that have been appropriated but unallotted or allotted but unexpended, shall be returned to the appropriate agency fund. Road fund moneys for a disapproved project or item that have been appropriated but unallotted or allotted but unexpended, shall be returned to the Road Fund Surplus Account.

Capital projects and major items of equipment disapproved under subsection (2) of this section shall be terminated.

During any biennium, the amount allotted from all sources for expenditure for the purchase of any major item of equipment shall not exceed the estimated cost of the item as shown in any branch budget bill enacted by the General Assembly and authorizing the purchase, except as provided in subsections (5) and (6) of this section and in KRS

45.770

and

45.780

.

A major item of equipment to be used for medical, scientific, or research purposes, excluding computer equipment and aircraft, may be authorized even though it is not specifically listed in any branch budget bill enacted for the current biennium, subject to the following conditions and procedures:

Moneys specifically budgeted and appropriated by the General Assembly for another purpose shall not be reallotted for expenditure on the item; moneys utilized shall not jeopardize any existing program and shall not require the use of any current general funds specifically dedicated to existing programs;

Funds are available for the purchase and the method of financing the purchase will not require an additional appropriation of state funds to acquire the item; and

The purchasing agency shall, within thirty (30) days after making the purchase, report the purchase to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee. The report shall include a description of the item, the purpose for which it will be used, the necessity for the purchase, and the amount expended for the purchase from each source of funds used.

Moneys from any source may be transferred to the allotment account of any capital project authorized by the General Assembly under this section, subject to the following conditions and procedures:

The total amount transferred shall not exceed fifteen percent (15%) of the amount authorized by the General Assembly unless:

The source of funds is private or federal; or

An unforeseen decision by a federal or state court or regulatory agency requires the transfer.

Moneys specifically budgeted and appropriated by the General Assembly for another purpose shall not be allotted or reallotted for expenditure on the capital project.

Moneys utilized shall not jeopardize any existing program and shall not require the use of any current general funds specifically dedicated to existing programs.

The relevant entity head, or his designee, shall submit the capital project to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee at least fourteen (14) days prior to the committee meeting. The submission shall include a written certification to the committee that the transfer, in excess of fifteen percent (15%) of the amount authorized by the General Assembly, is:

Paid for out of private or federal funds; or

Required by an unforeseen decision by a federal or state court or regulatory agency; and

Not allotted or reallotted from moneys specifically budgeted and appropriated by the General Assembly for another purpose; and

Not jeopardizing any existing program and not requiring the use of any current general funds specifically dedicated to existing programs.

If a capital project is financed with road funds, the cost overruns or scope increases shall be paid out of the highway contingency account established pursuant to KRS

45.247

.

A capital construction project or a major item of equipment may be authorized even though it is not specifically listed in any branch budget bill, subject to the following conditions and procedures:

Fifty percent (50%) or more of the actual cost shall be funded by federal or private funds, and fifty percent (50%) or less of the actual cost shall be funded by moneys appropriated to the capital construction and equipment purchase contingency account or, if the purpose of the project or equipment is to reduce energy costs, the relevant entity head certifies projected energy cost savings associated with the project or equipment are reasonable and sufficient to produce an aggregate simple payback period, as defined by KRS

56.770

, of five (5) years or less;

Moneys specifically budgeted and appropriated by the General Assembly for another purpose shall not be allotted or reallotted for expenditure on the project or major item of equipment; moneys utilized shall not jeopardize any existing program and shall not require the use of any current general funds specifically dedicated to existing programs; and

The relevant entity head, or his designee, shall submit the project or major item of equipment to the committee for review as provided by KRS

45.800

.

The capital construction and equipment purchase contingency fund may be used to advance funds to projects authorized to be financed by bonds, to finance feasibility studies for projects which may be contemplated for future funding, or to audit the capital projects program when authorized by the General Assembly.

On or before October 1, each branch of government shall submit to the committee the following information:

A complete list and summary description of every capital construction project and major item of equipment not completed as of June 30 of the prior fiscal year; and

For each project and major item of equipment, as of July 1, of the current fiscal year:

The project phase;

The project account number, project name, and any other term employed to identify the project or major item of equipment;

The available balance in the project or major item of equipment account, and any sums considered available for that project or major item of equipment;

A statement of the transfers of funds to or from the project or major item of equipment account; and, any account to which transfers from each project or major item of equipment has been made;

The year in which the project or major item of equipment was approved, with specific reference to the legislation by which the project or item was approved;

Total expenditure on the project or major item of equipment;

The current estimated completion cost, including the amount required for annual inflation; and

A statement that additional funds for the completion of the project or major item of equipment are or are not required; and, if required, why sufficient funds for completion are not available; and

The balance in the appropriated, but unallotted account; and the balance in any account, however designated, that contains appropriated, but unallotted funds for capital construction.

When the General Assembly authorizes a capital construction item in the capital construction section of a branch budget bill, the entity head charged with executing the branch budget shall construct the capital construction item according to the requirements set forth in the branch budget bill, supporting documentation considered by the General Assembly, and branch budget records. The entity head shall not deviate from these requirements with regard to:

Purpose or location to the extent that the capital construction item no longer meets the identified needs; or

Configuration for reasons other than practical accommodation to the construction site or specific program to be accommodated within that capital construction item.

History.

Enact. Acts 1979 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 2, effective January 1, 1980; 1982, ch. 300, § 7, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 450, § 60, effective July 1, 1983; 1984, ch. 410, § 2, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 46, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 30, § 3, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 507, § 4, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 47, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 387, § 19, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 375, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 423, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2001, ch. 58, § 23, effective June 21, 2001; 2009, ch. 78, § 31, effective June 25, 2009; 2011, ch. 73, § 6, effective June 8, 2011.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, J, 1, (7) at 1692.

45.763.
Requirement for General Assembly authorization before state agencies, institutions of higher education, or affiliated corporations enter into certain real property agreements — General Assembly approval of capital projects using public-private delivery method.

Notwithstanding any statutory provisions to the contrary, any state agency as defined in KRS

7A.010

, institution of higher education defined as an institution in KRS

164A.550

, or affiliated corporation as defined in KRS

164A.550

, shall obtain authorization from the General Assembly prior to entering into an agreement identified in subsection (2) of this section. The General Assembly authorization shall occur only when the General Assembly enacts legislation specifically authorizing the agreement.

General Assembly authorization shall be required for an agreement for the use, purchase, or acceptance of real property of any value, or equipment with a value in excess of four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000), if:

The agreement provides that the state, a state agency, institution of higher education, or affiliated corporation will become the owner of the real property or equipment at any time; and

All or any portion of the purchase price of the real property or equipment is funded through the issuance of a financial instrument which requires payment of principal and interest over time, including, but not limited to, notes, bonds, securities, and certificates of participation, regardless of the identity of the issuer.

For any capital projects authorized by KRS

45A.077

and utilizing the public-private partnership delivery method, the General Assembly has authorization through the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee to review and approve a project in accordance with KRS

45.800

. The contracting body shall report a capital project to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee after negotiations are complete with the project partner but prior to beginning work on the project for review and approval by the committee.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 423, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2017 ch. 132, § 4, effective March 27, 2017.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, J, 1, (7) at 1692.

45.765.
Branch budget bills.

The draft branch budget bills submitted to the General Assembly, and the branch budget bills enacted by the General Assembly, shall comply with the provisions of KRS

45.750

to

45.810

. Expressions of general exclusion, including but not limited to, “any act or statute to the contrary notwithstanding,” and “the provisions of any other law notwithstanding,” shall not be effective as an exemption from the provisions of KRS

45.750

to

45.810

. Exemptions from the provisions of KRS 45.750 to 45.810 shall include the specific projects exempted.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 300, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 47, § 3, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 387, § 20, effective July 15, 1994.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, J, 1, (7) at 1692.

45.770.
Contingency account.

There is created within the capital construction fund the capital construction and equipment purchase contingency account. The account shall consist of moneys appropriated to the account by the General Assembly.

Money in the capital construction and equipment purchase contingency account may be transferred to the allotment account of a capital construction project, authorized by the General Assembly under KRS

45.760

, subject to the following conditions and procedures:

Except as provided in paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection, during any biennium, the amount that may be transferred from the capital construction and equipment purchase contingency account to the allotment account of an authorized project shall not exceed an amount equal to fifteen percent (15%) of the estimated cost of the project, for that biennium, approved by the General Assembly in the manner provided by KRS

45.760

.

Subject to paragraph (c) of this subsection, if the cost of an authorized project exceeds, by more than fifteen percent (15%), its estimated cost, as approved by the General Assembly, due to an unforeseen decision by a federal or state court or regulatory agency, moneys in excess of fifteen percent (15%) of the estimated cost of the project may be transferred from the capital construction and equipment purchase contingency account to the allotment account of the project.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall, prior to making any transfer under this subsection, present the proposed transfer to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee, at least fourteen (14) days prior to the committee meeting, for review as provided by KRS

45.800

. Presentation of a proposed transfer under paragraph (b) of this subsection shall include written certification to the committee from the commissioner of the Department for Facilities and Support Services, Finance and Administration Cabinet, that the transfer is necessitated by cost increases resulting from an unforeseen decision by a federal or state court or regulatory agency.

Money in the capital construction and equipment purchase contingency account may be transferred to the allotment account of a major item of equipment, authorized by the General Assembly under KRS

45.760

, for expenditure on that item subject to the following conditions and procedures:

Except as provided in paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection, during any biennium, the amount that may be transferred from the capital construction and equipment purchase contingency account to the allotment account of an authorized major item of equipment shall not exceed an amount equal to fifteen percent (15%) of the estimated cost of the item, for that biennium, approved by the General Assembly in the manner provided by KRS

45.760

.

If the cost of an authorized major item of equipment exceeds, by more than fifteen percent (15%), its estimated cost, as approved by the General Assembly, due to an unforeseen decision by a federal or state court or regulatory agency, moneys in excess of fifteen percent (15%) of the estimated cost may be transferred from the capital construction and equipment purchase contingency account to the allotment account of the item.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall, prior to making any transfer under this subsection, present the proposed transfer to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee, at least fourteen (14) days prior to the committee meeting, for review as provided by KRS

45.800

. Presentation of a proposed transfer under paragraph (b) of this subsection shall include written certification to the committee from the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet that the transfer is necessitated by cost increases resulting from an unforeseen decision by a federal or state court or regulatory agency.

Money in the capital construction and equipment purchase contingency account may be transferred to a capital project account to be used for nonrecurring moving expenses of state agencies to address issues of public health and safety or governmental efficiency, subject to the following conditions and procedures:

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall, prior to making any transfer under this subsection, present the proposed transfer to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee, at least fourteen (14) days prior to the committee meeting, for review as provided by KRS

45.800

.

Presentation of a proposed transfer shall include written certification to the committee from the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet that the moving costs are nonrecurring, and describing the specific benefits, including but not limited to fiscal and efficiency savings associated with the proposal.

No transfer shall be used for capital improvements.

No later than thirty (30) days after a project has been accepted by the Commonwealth of Kentucky and the contracts encumbered against that project have been closed, moneys constituting the available balance in the project or equipment account shall be transferred as follows:

If the project was a line item in the budget and not funded with road funds, then the balance shall be transferred to the capital construction surplus account.

If the project was a line item in the budget and funded with road funds, then the balance shall be transferred to the road fund surplus account.

If the project was completed within the biennium in which it was authorized, and if the project was funded from a major maintenance pool, then the balance shall be transferred to that major maintenance pool.

If the project was not completed within the biennium in which it was authorized, without being expressly reauthorized by a succeeding session of the General Assembly, then the balance shall be transferred to the capital construction surplus account.

History.

Enact. Acts 1979 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 3, effective January 1, 1980; 1982, ch. 300, § 8, effective July 1, 1982; 1982, ch. 393, § 31, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 410, § 3, effective July 13, 1984; 1992, ch. 47, § 4, effective July 14, 1992; 2005, ch. 67, § 1, effective June 20, 2005.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/20/2005). 2005 Ky. Acts chs. 11,
85,
95,
97,
98,
99,
123, and
181 instruct the Reviser of Statutes to correct statutory references to agencies and officers whose names have been changed in 2005 legislation confirming the reorganization of the executive branch. Such a correction has been made in this section.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, J, 1, (7) at 1692.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. II, (2) at 1706.

45.775.
Capital construction surplus account.

There is created within the capital construction fund the capital construction surplus account. This account shall consist of income derived from the investment of moneys appropriated to the capital construction fund, including income derived from the investment of moneys appropriated to any capital construction account, and shall be appropriated and allotted as provided in KRS

45.750

through

45.800

. Moneys and income derived from bond proceeds shall not be included.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 300, § 2, effective July 15, 1982.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, J, 1, (7) at 1692.

45.777.
Sale of property purchased with capital construction funds.

The proceeds from the sale of major items of equipment or real property, purchased in whole or in part with capital construction funds, shall be deposited into the general fund unless federal funding restraints require otherwise.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to:

The sale of real property held as right-of-way;

The sale of equipment by the Transportation Cabinet; or

The sale of confiscated firearms.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 300, § 3, effective July 15, 1982; 2010 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 2, § 1, effective June 4, 2010.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, D, 7, (5) at 1664.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, J, 1, (7) at 1692.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, J, 1, (8) at 1692.

45.780.
Emergency repair, maintenance, and replacement account.

There is created within the capital construction fund the emergency repair, maintenance, and replacement account. The account shall consist of moneys appropriated to the fund by the General Assembly.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet may transfer money from the emergency repair, maintenance, and replacement account to the allotment account of an emergency repair, replacement, or maintenance project, for expenditure thereon, even though the specific project is not included in any branch budget bill enacted for that biennium. Moneys may be transferred from the emergency repair, maintenance, and replacement account to the allotment account of an emergency repair, replacement, or maintenance project only if no other funding source is available.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall report each transfer, including the necessity, purpose, and amount of the transfer, to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee not later than thirty (30) days after the transfer.

History.

Enact. Acts 1979 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 4, effective January 1, 1980; 1982, ch. 300, § 9, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 47, § 5, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 387, § 21, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 27, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2011, ch. 73, § 7, effective June 8, 2011.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, J, 1, (5) at 1692.

45.782.
Statewide deferred maintenance fund.

There is created within the capital construction fund the “Statewide Deferred Maintenance Fund”. The fund shall be used as a supplemental source for funding deferred maintenance and government mandate needs of state agencies. Maintenance includes equipment used primarily for maintenance purposes and expenditures related to deferred maintenance of infrastructure and capital assets. The balance of any moneys remaining in the fund at the close of any fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year.

Priority for the funding from the statewide deferred maintenance fund shall be determined by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet in consultation with the state budget director and the commissioner of the Department for Facilities Management. State agencies that do not have separate agency-specific maintenance funds or that have inadequate maintenance funds shall be given priority for access to moneys in the statewide deferred maintenance fund.

Moneys from the statewide deferred maintenance fund shall not be expended for:

New capital projects; or

Additional funding for any capital project that received line item authorization by the General Assembly in any branch budget bill.

The secretary shall, by September 1 of each year, report to the Legislative Research Commission all transfers from the fund, including the purpose and amount of each transfer and the amount of funds carried forward for the fiscal year ending on June 30 of that year.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 27, § 1, effective July 15, 1998.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, J, 1, (7) at 1692.

45.790.
Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee — Membership — Meetings — Vote required to act.

There is created a permanent subcommittee of the Legislative Research Commission to be known as the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee. The subcommittee shall be composed of eight (8) members appointed as follows: three (3) members of the Senate appointed by the President of the Senate; one (1) member of the minority party in the Senate appointed by the Minority Floor Leader in the Senate; three (3) members of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; and one (1) member of the minority party in the House of Representatives appointed by the Minority Floor Leader in the House of Representatives. The members of the subcommittee shall serve for terms of two (2) years, and the members appointed from each chamber shall elect one (1) member from their chamber to serve as co-chair. Any vacancy which may occur in the membership of the subcommittee shall be filled by the appointing authority who made the original appointment.

On an alternating basis, each co-chair shall have the first option to set the monthly meeting date. A monthly meeting may be canceled by agreement of both co-chairs. The co-chairs shall have joint responsibilities for subcommittee meeting agendas and presiding at subcommittee meetings. The members of the subcommittee shall be compensated for attending meetings as provided in KRS 7.090(3).

Any professional, clerical, or other employees required by the subcommittee shall be provided in accordance with KRS 7.090(4) and (5).

A majority of the entire membership of the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee shall constitute a quorum, and all actions of the subcommittee shall be by vote of a majority of its entire membership.

History.

Enact. Acts 1979 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 5, effective July 1, 1980; 2003, ch. 185, § 4, effective March 31, 2003.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(3/31/2003). Under the authority of KRS

7.136

, the Reviser of Statutes has changed two clearly erroneous references to “committee” in subsection (2) of this statute to “subcommittee.”

(6/21/93). The name of the Capital Construction and Equipment Purchase Oversight Committee was changed to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee in 1988. See 1988 Ky. Acts ch. 145. That same name change has been made in this statute pursuant to KRS 7.136(2).

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, J, 1, (7) at 1692.

45.793.
Quarterly status reports on incomplete capital projects to Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet and any institution that manages its own capital construction under KRS

164A.580

shall provide to the committee at its January, April, July, and October regular meetings a status report of any capital project, excluding items of equipment, not yet completed which received line item authorization by the Kentucky General Assembly or was authorized pursuant to KRS 45.760(7). The Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee shall prescribe data elements to be included in the quarterly status reports. For each capital project, the status report shall include but not be limited to the:

Project title;

County or counties in which the project is located;

Current phase of the project;

Estimated completion date of the project;

Explanation of any delay or major change in the project, including deletion or modification of project components; and

Any other information that the committee requests.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 339, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 31, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 119, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 328, § 3, effective July 15, 2002; 2009, ch. 78, § 32, effective June 25, 2009.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, J, 1, (7) at 1692.

45.794.
Semiannual status reports by Kentucky Public Transportation Infrastructure Authority.

The Kentucky Public Transportation Infrastructure Authority created pursuant to KRS

175B.015

shall provide to the committee at its January and July regular meetings a status report of any proposed or active project pursuant to KRS

175B.030

or

175B.035

. The report shall contain the same information as reports required by KRS

45.793

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 98, effective June 26, 2009.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, J, 1, (7) at 1692.